Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska73-205
Technology access clause; requirements.

(1) The Commission for the Blind and Visually Impaired, the Nebraska Information Technology Commission, and the Chief Information Officer, in consultation with other state agencies and after at least one public hearing, shall develop a technology access clause to be included in all contracts entered into by state agencies on and after January 1, 2001.

(2) The technology access clause shall clearly state, as a condition for the expenditure of state funds in the purchase of information technology, that the input and output technology shall be capable of supporting modification and otherwise provide for equivalent access for both visual and nonvisual use.

(3) The technology access clause shall be included in all contracts made by state agencies that involve the purchase of an automated information system, without regard to:

(a) The source of funds used to make the purchase;

(b) Whether the purchase is made under delegated purchasing authority; or

(c) The source of law under which the purchase is made.

Laws 2000, LB 352, § 19.